Idaho, session 2025, H0459.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Labor the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
I. ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES:
FROM:
EmploymentSecuritySpecialAdministration
Fund $1,250,000 $1,250,000
Federal Grant
Fund 0 $161,000 161,000
TOTAL $1,250,000 $161,000 $1,411,000
II. DETERMINATIONS:
FROM:
EmploymentSecuritySpecialAdministration
Fund $3,275,000 $3,275,000


FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
III. WORKFORCE AND COMMISSIONS:
FROM:
EmploymentSecuritySpecialAdministration
Fund $475,000 $475,000
GRAND TOTAL $5,000,000 $161,000 $5,161,000
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation to the Department of Labor is hereby reduced by the follow-
ing amounts from the designated programs for personnel costs from the Fed-
eral Grant Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
Determinations Program $4,000,000
Workforce and Commissions Program 1,000,000
TOTAL $5,000,000
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding any other authorization
provided by law to the contrary, the full-time equivalent position autho-
rization provided to the Department of Labor is hereby reduced by fifteen and
fifty-eight hundredths (15.58) for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026.
SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER. There is hereby appropriated and the Office
of the State Controller shall transfer up to $4,868,600 from the Employment
Security Administration and Reimbursement Fund to the Employment Security
Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. FUND BALANCE ADJUSTMENT. Pursuant to Section 67-3604, Idaho
Code, authority is hereby granted to the Idaho Department of Labor and the
Office of the State Controller to initiate system actions that will cor-
rect the fund balance in the Federal Grant Fund by an amount not to exceed
$12,477,700.
SECTION 6. FUND BALANCE ADJUSTMENT. Pursuant to Section 67-3604, Idaho
Code, authority is hereby granted to the Idaho Department of Labor and the
Office of the State Controller to initiate system actions that will correct
the fund balance in the Employment Security Special Administration Fund by
an amount not to exceed $2,509,900.
SECTION 7. FUND BALANCE ADJUSTMENT. Pursuant to Section 67-3604, Idaho
Code, authority is hereby granted to the Idaho Department of Labor and the
Office of the State Controller to record an accounting entry reducing the


balance in the Employment Security Fund by an amount not to exceed $4,047,900
and to make the necessary accounting adjustments to any impacted accounts
related thereto.
SECTION 8. FUND BALANCE ADJUSTMENT. Pursuant to Section 67-3604, Idaho
Code, authority is hereby granted to the Idaho Department of Labor and the
Office of the State Controller to record an accounting entry increasing the
balance in the Investment Balance in the Employment Security Reserve Fund by
an amount not to exceed $15,511,300 and to make the necessary accounting ad-
justments to any impacted accounts related thereto.
SECTION 9. REPORT ON FULL-TIME POSITIONS AND VACANCIES. The Department
of Labor shall provide a report to the Budget and Policy Analysis Division
of the Legislative Services Office on current authorized positions, filled
positions, active positions, length of vacancy for unfilled positions, and
salary savings for fiscal year 2025. This report shall be submitted no later
than September 30, 2025.
SECTION 10. REPORT ON ILLEGAL IMMIGRATION AND E-VERIFY. The Department
of Labor shall provide a report including an analysis of the impact of il-
legal immigration on the state's labor market and the potential costs and
benefits of using E-Verify. The report shall be submitted to the Joint Fi-
nance-Appropriations Committee and the Budget and Policy Analysis Division
of the Legislative Services Office no later than December 15, 2025.
SECTION 11. REPORT ON DISABILITY DETERMINATION SERVICES. The Depart-
ment of Labor shall provide a report including a review of the costs and ben-
efits of administering the Disability Determination Services at the state
level vs. the federal level and the law changes that are necessary to remove
state level determination. The report shall be submitted to the Joint Fi-
nance-Appropriations Committee and the Budget and Policy Analysis Division
of the Legislative Services Office no later than December 15, 2025.
SECTION 12. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 13. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.